Washington statutes.
RCW 18.20.340

Resident's family member administers medications or treatment—Written primary or alternate plan—Licensee's duty of care/negligence.

(1) An assisted living facility licensee may permit a resident's family member to administer medications or treatments or to provide medication or treatment assistance to the resident. The licensee shall disclose to the department, residents, the residents' legal representative if any, and if not, the residents' representative if any, and to interested consumers upon request, information describing whether the licensee permits such family administration or assistance and, if so, the extent of limitations or conditions thereof.

(2) If an assisted living facility licensee permits a resident's family member to administer medications or treatments or to provide medication or treatment assistance, the licensee shall request that the family member submit to the licensee a written medication or treatment plan. At a minimum, the written medication or treatment plan shall identify:

(a) By name, the family member who will administer the medication or treatment or provide assistance therewith;

(b) The medication or treatment administration or assistance that the family member will provide consistent with subsection (1) of this section. This will be referred to as the primary plan;

(c) An alternate plan that will meet the resident's medication or treatment needs if the family member is unable to fulfill his or her duties as specified in the primary plan; and

(d) An emergency contact person and telephone number if the assisted living facility licensee observes changes in the resident's overall functioning or condition that may relate to the medication or treatment plan.

(3) The assisted living facility licensee may require that the primary or alternate medication or treatment plan include other information in addition to that specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) The medication or treatment plan shall be signed and dated by:

(a) The resident, if able;

(b) The resident's legal representative, if any, and, if not, the resident's representative, if any;

(c) The resident's family member; and

(d) The assisted living facility licensee.

(5) The assisted living facility may through policy or procedure require the resident's family member to immediately notify the assisted living facility licensee of any change in the primary or alternate medication or treatment plan.

(6) When an assisted living facility licensee permits residents' family members to assist with or administer medications or treatments, the licensee's duty of care, and any negligence that may be attributed thereto, shall be limited to: Observation of the resident for changes in overall functioning consistent with RCW 18.20.280; notification to the person or persons identified in RCW 70.129.030 when there are observed changes in the resident's overall functioning or condition, or when the assisted living facility is aware that both the primary and alternate plan are not implemented; and appropriately responding to obtain needed assistance when there are observable or reported changes in the resident's physical or mental functioning.

[ 2012 c 10 s 23; 2004 c 142 s 6.]

NOTES:

Application—2012 c 10: See note following RCW 18.20.010.

Effective dates—2004 c 142: See note following RCW 18.20.020.